Hawaii statutes.
§21-6 Membership, quorum, voting. (a)
An investigating committee shall consist of not less than five members.

(b) A quorum shall consist of a majority of
the total authorized membership of the committee.

(c) No action shall be taken by a committee at
any meeting unless a quorum is present. The committee may act by a majority
vote of the members present and voting at a meeting at which there is a quorum,
unless the provisions of this chapter or any other statute require a greater
number or proportion. [L 1969, c 211, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next